Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.190.090

Students in institutional education facilities—Requirements for the department of children, youth, and families.

With respect to students in institutional education facilities governed by this chapter, the department of children, youth, and families must:

(1) Identify data needed by the department and institutional education facilities to evaluate the facilities' administrative and operational role in providing education to students and supporting students' educational outcomes. This data must include attendance, discipline rates, course and certificate completion rates, and other educational metrics;

(2) Analyze, and make a plan to resolve, department and institutional education facilities policies and practices that suspend the provision of educational services to a student as a disciplinary action, so that students are never denied the opportunity to engage in educational activities; and

(3) Review and resolve department and institutional education facility policies and practices that create barriers to students participating in meaningful learning opportunities, for example, career and technical education and postsecondary opportunities, in whatever location and format those opportunities are provided.

(4) In meeting the requirements of this section, the department of children, youth, and families must seek input from institutional education providers.

[ 2021 c 164 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2021 c 164: See note following RCW 28A.190.005.